pl: W zestawie powierzchnia cierna: Bez powierzchni ciernej (koło zamachowe elastyczne); Jednoczęściowa powierzchnia cierna; Wymienna wkładka cierna; Inna
el: Περιλαμβάνεται επιφάνεια τριβής: Χωρίς επιφάνεια τριβής (εύκαμπτος δίσκος); Μονοκόμματη επιφάνεια τριβής; Αντικαταστάσιμο ένθετο τριβής; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vključena je površina za trenje: Brez torne površine (prožna plošča - flexplate); Enodelna torna površina; Zamenljiv torni vstavek; Drugo
cs: Třecí plocha je součástí balení: Bez třecí plochy (flexplate); Jednodílná třecí plocha; Vyměnitelná třecí vložka; Jiné
en: Friction surface included: No friction surface (flexplate); One-piece friction surface; Replaceable friction insert; Other
nl: Wrijvingsvlak inbegrepen: Geen wrijvingsoppervlak (flexplate); Eendelig wrijvingsoppervlak; Vervangbaar wrijvingsinzetstuk; Overige
es: Superficie de fricción incluida: Sin superficie de fricción (placa flexible); Superficie de fricción de una pieza; Inserto de fricción reemplazable; Otro
it: Superficie di attrito inclusa: Nessuna superficie di attrito (disco flessibile); Superficie di attrito in un unico pezzo; Inserto di attrito sostituibile; Altro
pt-BR: Superfície de fricção incluída: Sem superfície de atrito (flexplate); Superfície de atrito em peça única; Inserto de atrito substituível; Outra
vi: Bề mặt ma sát đi kèm: Không có bề mặt ma sát (đĩa truyền động); Bề mặt ma sát nguyên khối; Tấm ma sát có thể thay thế; Khác
zh-TW: 是否包含摩擦面: 無摩擦面 (驅動盤); 一體式摩擦面; 可替換摩擦墊片; 其他
ja: 摩擦面付き: 摩擦面なし (フレックスプレート); ワンピース摩擦面; 交換可能な摩擦インサート; その他
sk-SK: Trecia plocha je súčasťou balenia: Bez trecej plochy (flexplate); Jednodielna trecia plocha; Vymeniteľná trecia vložka; Iné
de: Enthaltene Reibfläche: Keine Reibfläche (Flexplate); Einteilige Reibfläche; Austauschbarer Reibeinsatz; Sonstiges
fi: Mukana tuleva kitkapinta: Ei kitkapintaa (vetolevy); Yksiosainen kitkapinta; Vaihdettava kitkainsertti; Muu
lt-LT: Įtrauktas trinties paviršius: Be trinties paviršiaus (lanksti plokštė); Vientisas trinties paviršius; Keičiamas trinties įdėklas; Kita
hr-HR: Uključena površina za trenje: Nema tarne površine (savitljiva ploča); Tarna površina u jednom komadu; Zamjenjivi tarni umetak; Ostalo
ru: Наличие фрикционной поверхности: Без фрикционной поверхности (приводной диск); Цельная фрикционная поверхность; Сменная фрикционная вставка; Другое
ro-RO: Suprafață de frecare inclusă: Fără suprafață de fricțiune (placă flexibilă); Suprafață de fricțiune dintr-o singură piesă; Inserație de fricțiune înlocuibilă; Altele
th: รวมถึงพื้นผิวเสียดทาน: ไม่มีหน้าสัมผัสแรงเสียดทาน (เฟล็กซ์เพลต); หน้าสัมผัสแรงเสียดทานแบบชิ้นเดียว; แผ่นรองหน้าสัมผัสแรงเสียดทานเปลี่ยนได้; อื่นๆ
fr: Surface de friction incluse: Sans surface de friction (plaque flexible); Surface de friction monobloc; Insert de friction remplaçable; Autre
sv: Friktionsyta som ingår: Ingen friktionsyta (flexplatta); Friktionsyta i ett stycke; Utbytbar friktionsinsats; Övrigt
hu: Súrlódó felület mellékelve: Nincs dörzsfelület (flexplate); Egyrészes dörzsfelület; Cserélhető dörzsbetét; Egyéb
nb: Friksjonsflate inkludert: Ingen friksjonsoverflate (flexplate); Friksjonsoverflate i ett stykke; Utskiftbar friksjonsinnsats; Annet
ko: 마찰면 포함: 마찰면 없음(플렉스 플레이트); 일체형 마찰면; 교체형 마찰 인서트; 기타
zh-CN: 内含摩擦面: 无摩擦面（挠性盘）; 一体式摩擦面; 可更换摩擦嵌件; 其他
da: Medfølgende friktionsflade: Ingen friktionsoverflade (flexplate); Friktionsoverflade i ét stykke; Udskiftelig friktionsindsats; Andet
pt-PT: Superfície de fricção incluída: Sem superfície de fricção (placa flexível); Superfície de fricção numa só peça; Encaixe de fricção substituível; Outro
bg-BG: Включена е повърхност за триене: Без фрикционна повърхност (флексплейт); Фрикционна повърхност от една част; Сменяема фрикционна вложка; Друго
tr: Sürtünme yüzeyi dahil: Sürtünme yüzeyi yok (esnek plaka); Tek parça sürtünme yüzeyi; Değiştirilebilir sürtünme parçası; Diğer